North Carolina, session 2025, HB113.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is established the Joint Legislative Committee on Medicaid
Sustainability (Committee).
SECTION 2. The Committee consists of 12 members as follows: six senators are
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Six representatives are appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint a cochair of the Committee from
among its membership. Vacancies on the Committee shall be filled by the appointing authority.
SECTION 3. The purpose of the Committee is to consider various ways in which
the existing North Carolina Medicaid program could be modified to respond to any decreases in
federal support for the Medicaid program in order to maintain current State funding levels. These
modifications may include:
(1) Reduction or elimination of optional services.
(2) Reduction or elimination of optional eligibility groups.
(3) Additional or increased provider assessments.
(4) Reduction of reimbursement rates.
(5) Strategies for achieving managed care efficiencies.
(6) Any other opportunities for cost-savings.
SECTION 4. The Committee shall meet upon the call of its cochairs. A quorum of
the Committee is a majority of its members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote
at a meeting at which a quorum is present. The Committee, while in discharge of its official
duties, may exercise all powers provided under the provisions of G.S. 120-19 and G.S. 120-19.1
through G.S. 120-19.4, including the power to request all officers, agents, agencies, and
departments of the State to provide any information, data, or documents within their possession,
ascertainable from their records, or otherwise available to them, and the power to subpoena
witnesses.
SECTION 5. The Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and clerical
staff to assist the Committee in its work. The Director of Legislative Assistants of the House of
Representatives and the Director of Legislative Assistants of the Senate shall assign clerical
support staff to the Committee.
SECTION 6. Members of the Committee shall receive per diem, subsistence, and
travel allowance as provided in G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, and 138-6, as appropriate. Any expenses of
*H113-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Committee shall be considered expenses incurred for the joint operation of the General
Assembly.
SECTION 7. The Committee shall submit a final report on the results of its study,
including any proposed legislation, to the General Assembly no later than April 30, 2026. The
Committee shall terminate on April 30, 2026, or upon the filing of its final report, whichever
occurs first.
SECTION 8. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 113-First Edition